Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-819
Exemption from assessment and taxation.

All property of a regional metropolitan transit authority created pursuant to the Regional Metropolitan Transit Authority Act, all such authority's revenue, income, and operations, and all such authority's revenue bonds and equipment trust notes or certificates shall be exempt from any and all forms of assessment and taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 19.